Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1605
Contract for insurance.

Out of appropriations made for that purpose, the personnel division of the Department of Administrative Services shall (1) first enter into a contract providing, entirely at state expense, ten thousand dollars of basic life insurance protection and (2) enter into a contract to purchase a contract of group health insurance to be financed by the state to the extent that appropriations made for that purpose are available and, if necessary, by contributions from each employee. Each such contract shall provide insurance coverage for each employee specified in section 84-1601. Participation in the program of group health and life insurance shall be optional with the employee.

Laws 1973, LB 516, § 4;

Laws 1974, LB 789, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 556, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 273, § 8;

Laws 1987, LB 491, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-1623;

Laws 1989, LB 303, § 5;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 14, § 34;

Laws 1996, LB 1252, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 50.